cs: Technologie drcení/štěpkování: Disk; Buben; Válec s vysokým točivým momentem; Šroub; Jiné
es: Tecnología de astilladora: Disco; Tambor; Rodillo de alto par; Tornillo; Otros
nl: Versnipperaartechnologie: Schijf; Drum; High-torque roller; Schroef; Andere
it: Tecnologia della cippatrice: Disco; Tamburo; Rullo a coppia elevata; Vite; Altro
pl: Technologia rozdrabniania: Tarcza; Bęben; Rolka o wysokim momencie obrotowym; Śruba; Inne
tr: Parçalayıcı Teknolojisi: Disk; Davul; Yüksek torklu silindir; Vida; Diğer
pt-PT: Tecnologia do triturador: Disco; Tambor; Cilindro de alto torque; Parafuso; Outro
sk-SK: Technológia štiepkovania: Disk; Bubon; Valec s vysokým krútiacim momentom; Skrutkový; Iné
bg-BG: Технология на дробилка: Диск; Барабан; Ролка с висок въртящ момент; Винт; Други
lt-LT: Smulkintuvo technologija: Diskinis; Būgninis; Didelio sukimo momento volas; Sraigtinis; Kita
hr-HR: Tehnologija drobilice: Disk; Bubanj; Brzohodni valjak; Vijak; Ostalo
de: Spanertechnologie: Scheibe; Trommel; Walze mit hohem Drehmoment; Schraube; Sonstiges
hu: Aprítógép technológiája: Tárcsa; Dob; Nagy nyomatékú görgő; Csavar; Egyéb
zh-TW: 粉碎機技術: 磁碟式; 鼓; 高扭力滾輪; 螺旋式; 其他
sv: Flisningsteknik: Disk; Trumma; Vals med högt vridmoment; Skruv; Övrigt
fi: Hakkuriteknologia: Levy; Rumpu; Korkean vääntömomentin rulla; Ruuvi; Muu
ru: Тип рубильной машины: Диск; Барабан; Ролик с высоким крутящим моментом; Винтовой; Другое
nb: Flisemaskinteknologi: Disk; Tromme; Rulle med høyt dreiemoment; Skrue; Annet
sl-SI: Tehnologija sekalnika: Disk; Bobenski; Valj z visokim navorom; Privijanje; Drugo
ja: チッパー技術: ディスク; ドラム; 高トルクローラー; ネジ; その他
zh-CN: 削片机技术: 盘式; 鼓; 高扭矩滚筒; 螺丝; 其他
el: Τεχνολογία μηχανής τεμαχισμού: Δίσκος; Τάμπουρο; Κύλινδρος υψηλής ροπής; Βιδωτή; Άλλο
vi: Công nghệ máy băm gỗ: Đĩa; Trống; Con lăn mô-men xoắn cao; Đinh vít; Khác
ro-RO: Tehnologie echipament pentru împrăștiere pietriș: Disc; Tambur; Rolă cu cuplu mare; Șurub; Altele
fr: Technologie de la broyeuse: Disque; Tambour; Rouleau à couple élevé; Vis; Autre
pt-BR: Tecnologia do triturador: Discos; Tambor; Rolo de alto torque; Parafuso; Outro
en: Chipper technology: Disk; Drum; High-torque roller; Screw; Other
ko: 치퍼 기술: 디스크; 드럼; 하이토크 롤러; 나사; 기타
th: เทคโนโลยีชิปเปอร์: ดิสก์; กลอง; ลูกกลิ้งแรงบิดสูง; สกรู; อื่นๆ
da: Chipper-teknologi: Skive; Tromme; Rulle med højt drejningsmoment; Skrue; Andet